Washington statutes.
RCW 2.70.070

Parents for parents program—Goal—Structured peer mentoring.

(1) The goal of the parents for parents program is to increase the permanency and well-being of children in foster care through peer mentoring that increases parental engagement and contributes to family reunification.

(2) The parents for parents program may provide structured peer mentoring for families entering the dependency court system, administered by parent allies.

[ 2020 c 33 s 4; 2015 c 117 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—2020 c 33: See note following RCW 74.13.715.

Intent—2015 c 117: See note following RCW 2.70.060.